src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON 2SYLL_ORROOD_V  !!= * __@CODE@__ like njihhood, but different triggers here and there. 24 verbs
:  VINFINITES_ORROOD ;
+Ind: EVEN_IND_ORROOD ;
+Cond+Prs:o^WG%> EVEN_COND ;
+Pot+Prs:o^WG EVEN_POT_ORROOD ;
+Imprt:o EVEN_IMPRT_ORROOD ;
+Der4+Der/InchL:o^WG%>škyett4 4SYLL_KYETTID_DER ;
+Der1+Der/st:o^SVst^WG 3_DERIVED ;
+Der1+Der/tt:o^SVtt^WG 3_DERIVED ;
+Der1+Der/d:o^SVd^WG 3_DERIVED ; !
!DERL+V+Der1+Der/l:ol 3_DERIVED_L ;
:o^CSH DER_MAS ;
+Der3+Der/Pass:u2^CLEN C_PASS_SH ; !TEST hilgojii

LEXICON VINFINITES_ORROOD
+Inf:o^CLEN%>ođ K ;
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:o^WG K ;
+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:o^WG^CLEN%>om K ;
+Cond+Prs+ConNeg:o^WG%>ččii K ;
+Pot+Prs+ConNeg:u^VHIGH%>u K ; !urruu
+Imprt+ConNeg:o^WG K ;
+PrsPrc:o^CLEN%>o K ;
+PrfPrc:o^CLEN%>om K ;
+VAbess:o^WG VABESS ;
+VGen:o^WG%>n VGEN ;


+Actio+Nom:o^CLEN%>om NOMACT ;
+Actio+Ill:o^CSH%>mân K ;
+Actio+Loc:o^CSH%>mist K ;
+Actio+Com:o^CSH%>máin K ;
+Actio+Ess:o^CSH%>min K ;
+Ger+PxSg1:o^WG%>dijnân K ;
+Ger+PxSg2:o^WG%>dijnâđ K ;
+Ger+PxSg3+Err/Orth:o^WG%>dijnes K ;
+Ger+PxSg3:o^WG%>dijnis K ;
+Ger:o^WG%>dijn K ;
+Der4+Der/NomAct:o^CLEN%>om FLAG_3EEMEED ;


LEXICON EVEN_IND_ORROOD   !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Prs+Sg1:o^WG%>m K ; ! vah^RCo^WG>m
+Prs+Sg2:o^WG%>h K ;
+Prs+Sg3:o^CSH K ;
+Prs+Du1:o^CLEN%>on K ;
+Prs+Du2:o^CSH%>vettee K ;
+Prs+Du3:o^CLEN%>ov K ;
+Prs+Pl1:o^CLEN%>op K ;
+Prs+Pl2:o^CSH%>vetteđ K ;
+Prs+Pl3:o^CSH%>h K ; ! oroh

+Prt+Sg1:u^VHIGH^RLEN%>m K ;
+Prt+Sg2:u^VHIGH^RLEN%>h K ; !uurruh
+Prt+Sg3:o^WG%>i K ;
+Prt+Du1:o^WG%>im K ;
+Prt+Du2:o^WG%>id K ;
+Prt+Du3:o^WG%>in K ;
+Prt+Pl1:o^WG%>im K ;
+Prt+Pl2:o^WG%>id K ;
+Prt+Pl3:u^VHIGH%>u K ; ! urruu

LEXICON EVEN_POT_ORROOD !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Sg1:^WG^RLEN%>om K ;
+Sg2:^WG^RLEN%>oh K ;
+Sg3:^WG^RLEN%>oš K ;
+Du1:^WG%>žeen K ;
+Du2:^WG^RLEN%>ošvettee K ;
+Du3:^WG%>žává K ;
+Pl1:^WG%>žep K ;
+Pl2:^WG^RLEN%>ošvetteđ K ;
+Pl3:^WG%>žeh K ;

LEXICON EVEN_IMPRT_ORROOD  !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Sg2:^WG K ;
+Sg3:^WG%>s K ;
+Du1:^CLEN%>on K ;
+Du2:^CLEN%>o K ;
+Du3:^CLEN%>os K ;
+Pl1:^CLEN%>op K ;
+Pl2:%>ođ K ; !orroođ
+Pl3:^CLEN%>os K ;


!! !UD verbs

LEXICON 2SYLL_KUARRUD
+V: 2SYLL_KUARRUD_V ;
LEXICON 2SYLL_KUARRUD_IV
+V+IV: 2SYLL_KUARRUD_V ;
LEXICON 2SYLL_KUARRUD_TV
+V+TV: 2SYLL_KUARRUD_V ;

LEXICON 2SYLL_KUARRUD_V  !!= * __@CODE@__ long dipht => -o . 56 verbs
VINFINITES_KUARRUD ; ! pákkuđ has a PASS according to this contlex
+Ind: EVEN_IND_KUARRUD ;
+Pot+Prs: EVEN_POT_KUARRUD ;
+Cond+Prs:u^WG^RVSH%> EVEN_COND ;
+Cond+Prs:o^WG^RVSH%> EVEN_COND ;
+Imprt: EVEN_IMPRT_KUARRUD ;
+Der4+Der/InchL:u^WG^RVSH%>škyett4 4SYLL_KYETTID_DER ;
+Der1+Der/st:ust^WG^RVSH 3_DERIVED ; ! čiärustiđ či5ärr
+Der3+Der/Pass:u2 C_PASS_SH ; !  ?? CLEN?
+Der1+Der/tt:utt^WG 3_DERIVED ;
+Der1+Der/d:ud^WG 3_DERIVED ; !
:u^CSH DER_MAS ;

LEXICON VINFINITES_KUARRUD !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Inf:u%>đ K ;

+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:u^WG^RLEN K ;
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Use/NG:o^WG^RVSH K ;
+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:um K ;
+Cond+Prs+ConNeg:u^WG^RVSH%>ččii K ;
+Cond+Prs+ConNeg+Use/NG:o^WG^RVSH%>ččii K ;
+Pot+Prs+ConNeg:u^VBACK^RVSH%>u K ;
+Imprt+ConNeg:u K ;
+PrsPrc:o^RVSH%>o K ;
+PrfPrc:u%>m K ;
+Der2+Der/NomAg:o%> C_TAHHEE ;
+VAbess:u^WG^RVSH VABESS ;
+VAbess+Use/NG:o^WG^RVSH VABESS ;
+VGen:u^WG^RLEN%>n VGEN ;


+Actio+Nom:u%>m NOMACT ;
+Actio+Ill:u^CSH^RVSH%>mân K ;
+Actio+Loc:u^CSH^RVSH%>mist K ;
+Actio+Com:u^CSH^RVSH%>máin K ;
+Actio+Ess:u^CSH^RVSH%>min K ;
+Ger+PxSg1:u^WG^RVSH%>dijnân K ;
+Ger+PxSg1+Use/NG:o^WG^RVSH%>dijnân K ;
+Ger+PxSg2:u^WG^RVSH%>dijnâd K ;
+Ger+PxSg2+Use/NG:o^WG^RVSH%>dijnâd K ;
+Ger+PxSg3+Err/Orth:u^WG^RVSH%>dijnes K ;
+Ger+PxSg3:u^WG^RVSH%>dijnis K ;
+Ger+PxSg3+Use/NG:o^WG^RVSH%>dijnis K ;
+Ger:u^WG^RVSH%>dijn K ;
+Ger+Use/NG:o^WG^RVSH%>dijn K ;
+Der4+Der/NomAct:u^SV%>m FLAG_3HUKSIM ;


LEXICON EVEN_IND_KUARRUD !!= * __@CODE@__
+Prs+Sg1:u^WG^RLEN%>m K ;
+Prs+Sg1+Err/Orth:o^WG^RLEN%>m K ;
+Prs+Sg2:u^WG^RLEN%>h K ;
+Prs+Sg2+Err/Orth:o^WG^RLEN%>h K ;
+Prs+Sg3:u^CSH K ;
+Prs+Du1:o^CLEN^RVSH%>on K ;
+Prs+Du2:u^CSH^RVSH%>vettee K ; ! CSH
+Prs+Du3:u%>v K ;
+Prs+Pl1:u%>p K ;
+Prs+Pl2:u^CSH^RVSH%>vetteđ K ; ! CSH
+Prs+Pl3:u^CSH%>h5 K ; ! reusing h5 to prevent á to a !CSH
+Prs+Pl3+Err/Orth:u%>h5 K ; !

+Prt+Sg1:u^VBACK^RLEN%>m K ;
+Prt+Sg2:u^VBACK^RLEN%>h K ;
+Prt+Sg3:u^WG^RLEN%>i K ;
+Prt+Sg3+Use/NG:o^WG^RVSH%>i K ;
+Prt+Du1:u^WG^RLEN%>im K ;
+Prt+Du1+Use/NG:o^WG^RVSH%>im K ;
+Prt+Du2:u^WG^RLEN%>id K ;
+Prt+Du2+Use/NG:o^WG^RVSH%>id K ;
+Prt+Du3:u^WG^RLEN%>in K ;
+Prt+Du3+Use/NG:o^WG^RVSH%>in K ;
+Prt+Pl1:u^WG^RLEN%>im K ;
+Prt+Pl1+Use/NG:o^WG^RVSH%>im K ;
+Prt+Pl2:u^WG^RLEN%>id K ;
+Prt+Pl2+Use/NG:o^WG^RVSH%>id K ;
+Prt+Pl3:u^CLEN^VBACK^RVSH%>u K ; !

LEXICON EVEN_POT_KUARRUD !!= * __@CODE@__
+Sg1:o^WG%>om K ;
+Sg2:o^WG%>oh K ;
+Sg3:u^WG^RLEN%>š K ;
+Du1:u^WG^RVSH%>žeen K ;
+Du1+Use/NG:o^WG^RVSH%>žeen K ;
+Du2:u^WG^RLEN%>švettee K ;
+Du2+Use/NG:o^WG%>švettee K ;
+Du3:u^WG^RVSH%>žává K ;
+Du3+Use/NG:o^WG^RVSH%>žává K ;
+Pl1:u^WG^RVSH%>žep K ;
+Pl1+Use/NG:o^WG^RVSH%>žep K ;
+Pl2:u^WG^RLEN%>švetteđ K ;
+Pl2+Use/NG:o^WG^RVSH%>švetteđ K ;
+Pl3:u^WG^RVSH%>žeh K ;
+Pl3+Use/NG:o^WG^RVSH%>žeh K ;

LEXICON EVEN_IMPRT_KUARRUD  !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Sg2:u^WG^RLEN K ;
+Sg2+Use/NG:o^WG^RVSH K ;
+Sg3:u^WG^RLEN%>s K ;
+Du1:o^CLEN^RVSH%>on K ;
+Du2:o^CLEN^RVSH%>o K ;
+Du3:u^CLEN^RLEN%>s K ;
+Pl1:u^CLEN^RLEN%>p K ;
+Pl2:u%>đ K ;
+Pl3:u^CLEN^RLEN%>s K ;


LEXICON 2SYLL_UD
+V: 2SYLL_UD_V ;
LEXICON 2SYLL_UD_IV
+V+IV: 2SYLL_UD_V ;
LEXICON 2SYLL_UD_TV
+V+TV: 2SYLL_UD_V ;


LEXICON 2SYLL_UD_V  !!= * __@CODE@__ 175 verbs
VINFINITES_UD ; ! pákkuđ has a PASS according to this contlex
+Ind: EVEN_IND_UD ;
+Pot+Prs: EVEN_POT_UD ;
+Cond+Prs:u^WG%> EVEN_COND ;
+Imprt: EVEN_IMPRT_UD ;
+Der4+Der/InchL:u^WG%>škyett4 4SYLL_KYETTID_DER ; !kuáivuškyettiđ
+Der1+Der/d:ud^WG 3_DERIVED ; !lávludiđ
+Der1+Der/st:ust^WG 3_DERIVED ;
+Der1+Der/tt:utt^WG 3_DERIVED ;
+Der2+Der/NomAg:o%> C_TAHHEE ;

!DERL+V+Der1+Der/l:ol 3_DERIVED_L ;
:u DER_MAS ;
+Der3+Der/Pass:u2^CLEN C_PASS_SH ; ! u2

LEXICON VINFINITES_UD !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Inf:u%>đ K ;
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:u^WG^RLEN K ;
+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:u%>m K ; ! u2
+Cond+Prs+ConNeg:u^WG%>ččii K ;
+Pot+Prs+ConNeg:u^VBACK%>u K ; ! u2
+Imprt+ConNeg:u K ;
+PrsPrc:o%>o K ;
+PrfPrc:u%>m K ;
+VAbess:u^WG VABESS ;
+VGen:u^WG^RLEN%>n VGEN ;

+Actio+Nom:u%>m NOMACT ;
+Actio+Ill:u%>mân K ;
+Actio+Loc:u%>mist K ;
+Actio+Com:u%>máin K ;
+Actio+Ess:u%>min K ;
+Ger+PxSg1:u^WG%>dijnân K ;
+Ger+PxSg2:u^WG%>dijnâd K ;
+Ger+PxSg3+Err/Orth:u^WG%>dijnes K ;
+Ger+PxSg3:u^WG%>dijnis K ;
+Ger:u^WG%>dijn K ;
+Der4+Der/NomAct:u^SV%>m FLAG_3HUKSIM ;


LEXICON EVEN_IND_UD !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Prs+Sg1:u^WG^RLEN%>m K ;
+Prs+Sg2:u^WG^RLEN%>h K ;
+Prs+Sg3:u K ;             ! CSH
+Prs+Du1:o^CLEN^RVSH%>on K ;
+Prs+Du2:u%>vettee K ; ! CSH
+Prs+Du3:u%>v K ;
+Prs+Pl1:u%>p K ;
+Prs+Pl2:u%>vetteđ K ; ! CSH
+Prs+Pl3:u%>h5 K ; ! reusing h5 to prevent á to a !CSH
+Prs+Pl3+Err/Orth:u^CSH%>h5 K ; !

+Prt+Sg1:u^VBACK%>m K ; ! u2
+Prt+Sg2:u^VBACK%>h K ; ! u2
+Prt+Sg3:u^WG^RLEN%>i K ;
+Prt+Du1:o^WG^CLEN%>im K ; ! čuárvoim
+Prt+Du2:o^WG^CLEN%>id K ; ! čuárvoid
+Prt+Du3:o^WG^CLEN%>in K ; ! čuárvoin
+Prt+Pl1:u^WG^RLEN%>im K ;
+Prt+Pl2:u^WG^RLEN%>id K ;
+Prt+Pl3:u^CLEN^VBACK^RVSH%>u K ; ! u2

LEXICON EVEN_POT_UD !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Sg1:o^CLEN%>om K ;
+Sg2:o^CLEN%>oh K ;
+Sg3:u^WG^RLEN%>š K ;
+Du1:u^WG%>žeen K ;
+Du2:u^WG^RLEN%>švettee K ;
+Du3:u^WG%>žává K ;
+Pl1:u^WG%>žep K ;
+Pl2:u^WG^RLEN%>švetteđ K ;
+Pl3:u^WG%>žeh K ;

LEXICON EVEN_IMPRT_UD !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Sg2:u^WG^VHIGH^RLEN K ;
+Sg3:u^WG^RLEN%>s K ;
+Du1:o^CLEN%>on K ;
+Du2:o^CLEN%>o K ;
+Du3:u^CLEN%>s K ;
+Pl1:u^CLEN^VHIGH%>p K ;
+Pl2:u^VHIGH%>đ K ;
+Pl3:u^CLEN%>s K ;

LEXICON 2SYLL_UAZZUD
+V: 2SYLL_UAZZUD_V ;
LEXICON 2SYLL_UAZZUD_IV
+V+IV: 2SYLL_UAZZUD_V ;
LEXICON 2SYLL_UAZZUD_TV
+V+TV: 2SYLL_UAZZUD_V ;
