src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs
ciäkkuđ:ciäkk4 2SYLL_UAZZUD_TV ; ! ciähum ! ciäkˊk
ciävvuđ:ciävv 2SYLL_KUARRUD_IV ;
hiäibuđ:hiäi4b 2SYLL_UAZZUD_IV ; ! hiäibum ! heibum heibuu
hiälssuđ:hiälss 2SYLL_UAZZUD_TV "huuhdella" ;
hiäŋguđ:hiäŋg 2SYLL_UAZZUD_TV ;
huáikkuđ:hu5ái4kk4 2SYLL_UD_TV ;
hárruđ:há^RVrr 2SYLL_UD_IV ; ! háárum
hávduđ:há^RVvd 2SYLL_UD ; ! háávdum
háávvuđ:háávv 2SYLL_KUARRUD ; ! háávum havvuu
háŋguđ:há^RVŋg 2SYLL_UD_TV ; ! hááŋgum
iädduđ:iädd 2SYLL_UAZZUD_IV ;
iärduđ:iärd 2SYLL_UAZZUD ; ! iärdum ! erdum erduu
jiäŋŋuđ:ji5äŋŋ 2SYLL_KUARRUD_IV ; ! jiäŋum jieŋŋuu
kiärduđ:kiärd 2SYLL_UAZZUD ; ! kiärdum ! kerdum kerduu
kiävvuđ:kiävv 2SYLL_KUARRUD ;
kuolgâmiärkkuđ:kuolgâ#miärkk4 2SYLL_UAZZUD ;
kuáivuđ:kuái4v 2SYLL_UAZZUD_TV ; ! kuáivum ! kuáiˊv
kuáppuđ:ku5ápp 2SYLL_UD_IV ; ! kuápum ! kuápˊp
kuárruđ:kuárr 2SYLL_KUARRUD_TV ; ! kuárum korruu YAML
kuárŋuđ:kuárŋ 2SYLL_UAZZUD_IV ; ! kuárŋum ! korŋum korŋuu
kuásmuđ:ku5ásm 2SYLL_UD ; ! kuásmum ! kuásˊm
kuáttuđ:ku5átt4 2SYLL_KUARRUD_TV ; ! kuáđum kuátu kuátuh kuottuu
káivuđ:ká^RVi4v 2SYLL_UD_TV ;
kááijuđ:káái4j 2SYLL_KUARRUD_TV ; ! káájum kaijuu
káárruđ:káárr 2SYLL_KUARRUD ; !¢ kááru
liädduđ:liädd 2SYLL_UAZZUD_TV ; !¢ liädum ! liädˊdu
liäibuđ:liäi4b 2SYLL_UAZZUD_TV ; ! +Prt+Sg3: leibuu not done; Actio liäibum
liävvuđ:liävv 2SYLL_KUARRUD_TV ;
liäškuđ:liäšk 2SYLL_UAZZUD_TV ; ! liäškum ! liäšˊk
luágguđ:lu5ágg 2SYLL_UD_IV ; ! luágum ! loggum logguu
luákkuđ:lu5ákk4 2SYLL_UD ;
luážžuđ:luážž 2SYLL_UAZZUD ; ! luážui ! luážˊž
lávguđ:lá^RVvg 2SYLL_UD_TV ; ! láávgum
láámmuđ:láámm 2SYLL_KUARRUD ; ! ¢ láámu láámum
láávvuđ:láávv 2SYLL_KUARRUD ;
miäsmuđ:miäsm 2SYLL_UAZZUD ;
muássuđ:mu5áss 2SYLL_KUARRUD ; !¢ muásum muásu muásuh
muávluđ:mu5ávl 2SYLL_UD ;
niälguđ:niälg 2SYLL_UAZZUD ;
njuálluđ:njuáll 2SYLL_KUARRUD_TV ; ! njuálum, njuolluu
njuárbuđ:nju5árb 2SYLL_UD ; ! njuárbum ! njorbuu
njuárguđ:njuárg 2SYLL_UAZZUD_IV ;
njuáđđuđ:njuáđđ 2SYLL_KUARRUD ;
njálmuđ:njá^RVlm 2SYLL_UD_IV ;
njávguđ:njá^RVvg 2SYLL_UD_IV ; ! njáávgum
nuáttuđ:nu5átt 2SYLL_UD_TV ; ! nuátum ! nuátˊt
nááđđuđ:nááđđ 2SYLL_KUARRUD_IV ; ! nááđum nađđuu
piälkkuđ:piälkk4 2SYLL_UAZZUD ; ! piälhum ! piälˊkk
puáksuđ:pu5ák4s 2SYLL_UD ; ! XXX ks-vs
pálttuđ:pá^RVltt 2SYLL_UD_TV ; ! pááltum
párguđ:pá^RVrg 2SYLL_UD_IV ; ! páárgum
riännjuđ:ri5ännj 2SYLL_KUARRUD ;
ruáinuđ:ru5ái4n 2SYLL_UD ; ! ruáinum ! ruáiˊn
ruáiskuđ:ru5ái4sk 2SYLL_UD_TV ; ! ruáiskum ! ruáisˊk
ruássuđ:ruáss 2SYLL_KUARRUD ;
rábbuđ:rá^RVbb 2SYLL_UD_IV ;
rááppuđ:ráápp4 2SYLL_KUARRUD_TV ; ! ráávum
siägguđ:si5ägg 2SYLL_UD ; ! siägum ! seggum segguu
siäijuđ:si5äi4j 2SYLL_KUARRUD_IV ; ! siäJu, sieijuu
siäiluđ:siäi4l 2SYLL_UAZZUD_IV ; ! siäilum ! siäiˊl
siäđđuđ:si5äđđ 2SYLL_KUARRUD_IV ; ! siäđu seđđuu
skiälguđ:skiälg 2SYLL_UAZZUD_IV ; ! skiälgum ! skiälˊg
smiärruđ:smi5ärr 2SYLL_KUARRUD_IV ;
sniälkkuđ:sniälkk4 2SYLL_UAZZUD ; ! sniälhui ! sniälˊkk
snuálttuđ:snuáltt 2SYLL_UD ;
spiäkkuđ:spi5äkk4 2SYLL_UD_IV ; ! spiähum ! spiäkˊk
stuárguđ:stuárg 2SYLL_UAZZUD_TV ;
stuárruđ:stu5árr 2SYLL_KUARRUD_IV ; ! YAML
suávvuđ:su5ávv 2SYLL_UD_IV ;
sárguđ:sá^RVrg 2SYLL_UD_TV ; ! sáárgum
tiämbuđ:tiämb 2SYLL_UAZZUD ; ! tiämbum ! tembum tembuu
tiännuđ:tiänn 2SYLL_KUARRUD ; ! tiänum tiennuu
tuádduđ:tu5ádd 2SYLL_UD ;
tuágguđ:tu5ágg 2SYLL_UD_IV ; ! tuágguh ! tuoggum tuogguu
tuáijuđ:tu5ái4j 2SYLL_KUARRUD_TV ; ! 
tuálvuđ:tuálv 2SYLL_UAZZUD_TV ; ! tuálvum ! tuálˊv
tuáppuđ+v2:tuápp4 2SYLL_KUARRUD_TV "näpistellä" ; ! tuávum
tuárruđ:tuárr 2SYLL_KUARRUD_TV ; ! tuárum torruu
tuárššuđ:tuáršš 2SYLL_UAZZUD ;
tuáškuđ:tuášk 2SYLL_UAZZUD_TV ; ! tuáškum ! tuášˊk
tálkkuđ:tá^RVlkk4 2SYLL_UD_TV ;
tááijuđ:táái4j 2SYLL_KUARRUD_IV ; ! táájum taijuu
uánnuđ:uánn 2SYLL_KUARRUD_IV ;
uážžuđ:uážž 2SYLL_UAZZUD_TV ; ! uážum ! uážˊž !YAML
vuáijuđ:vu5ái4j 2SYLL_KUARRUD_IV ; ! vuájum vuoijuu
vuáččuđ:vu5áčč 2SYLL_UD ; ! vuáčum vuáčču vuoččum vuoččuu
áiguđ:á^RVi4g 2SYLL_UD_TV ; ! ááigum ! aigum aiguu
áánnuđ:áánn 2SYLL_KUARRUD_TV ; ! áánum
čiärguđ:čiärg 2SYLL_UAZZUD_IV ;
čuálluđ:čuáll 2SYLL_KUARRUD ; ! čuálum, čolluu
čuáskuđ:ču5ásk 2SYLL_UD_IV ; ! čuáskum ! čuásˊk
čuávvuđ:ču5ávv 2SYLL_KUARRUD_TV ; ! čuávum čuovvuu
čuážžuđ:ču5ážž 2SYLL_UAZZUD_IV ; ! čuážum ! čuážˊž
čárvuđ:čá^RVrv 2SYLL_UD_TV ; ! čáárvum
šiälguđ:šiälg 2SYLL_UAZZUD_IV ; ! šiälgum ! šelgum šelguu
šliäđguđ:šliäđg 2SYLL_UAZZUD ; ! šliäđgum ! šleđgum šleđguu
šuávvuđ:šu5ávv 2SYLL_KUARRUD ; ! šuávvu šuovvuu
šávguđ:šá^RVvg 2SYLL_UD ; ! šáávgum
